Missouri, session 2026, SB1055.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Sections 144.049, 144.526, 542.301, 563.016,
563.031, 571.020, and 571.095, RSMo, are repealed and eleven
new sections enacted in lieu thereof, to be known as sections
1.486, 144.049, 144.526, 542.301, 563.031, 563.085, 571.020,
571.095, 571.930, 571.935, and 571.940, to read as follows:
1.486. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Anti-Red Flag Gun Seizure Act".
2. As used in this section, "red flag law" means:
(1) Any gun control law, order, or measure that
directs the temporary or permanent seizure of any firearm,
firearm accessory, or ammunition of an individual without
the adjudication of a contested court case; or
(2) Any federal statute, federal rule, federal
executive order, or federal judicial order or finding, or
any state statute, state rule, state executive order, or
state judicial order or finding, that:
(a) Prohibits a Missouri citizen from owning,
possessing, transporting, transferring, or receiving any
firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition unless the
EXPLANATION-Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in this bill is not enacted
and is intended to be omitted in the law.

SB 1055 2
individual has been convicted of a violent felony crime or
is otherwise disqualified under section 455.050 or 571.070;
or
(b) Orders the removal or requires the surrender of
any firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition from a
Missouri citizen unless the individual has been convicted of
a violent felony crime or is otherwise disqualified under
section 455.050 or 571.070.
3. Any federal order of protection, other judicial
order issued by a federal court, or federal executive order
that is a red flag law or otherwise directs the confiscation
of any firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition from any
law-abiding citizen within the borders of this state shall
not be enforced in this state by any state agency, political
subdivision, or state or local law enforcement agency.
4. No state agency, political subdivision, or state or
local law enforcement agency shall receive any federal
moneys for the purpose of enforcing any federal statute,
federal rule, federal executive order, or federal judicial
order or findings, or for the purpose of enforcing any state
statute, state rule, state executive order, or state
judicial order or findings, that would have the effect of
enforcing a red flag law against a Missouri citizen.
5. No state entity or employee thereof, political
subdivision or employee thereof, or other entity or person
shall have the authority to enforce or attempt to enforce a
red flag law regardless of the red flag law's origin or the
authority of the issuing entity. This subsection shall not
apply to any agent of the federal government enforcing a
federal law or federal order.
6. Nothing in this section shall be construed to
prevent a firearm, firearm accessory, or ammunition from

SB 1055 3
being seized as evidence by law enforcement in the course of
an investigation.
7. (1) A political subdivision or state or local law
enforcement agency that employs a law enforcement officer
who knowingly acts to violate this section and enforce a red
flag law under the color of any state or federal statute,
rule, executive order, or judicial order or finding shall be
liable to the party against whom the red flag law was
enforced in an action at law, suit in equity, or other
proper proceeding for redress and shall be subject to a
civil penalty of fifty thousand dollars per occurrence.
(2) Any person injured under this section shall have
standing to pursue an action for injunctive relief in the
circuit court of the county in which the action allegedly
occurred or in the circuit court of Cole County.
(3) The court shall hold a hearing on any motion for a
temporary restraining order or preliminary injunction within
thirty days of service of a petition for the same.
(4) In an action brought under this section by a party
against whom the red flag law was enforced, a court may
order injunctive or other equitable relief, recovery of
damages, other legal remedies, and payment of reasonable
attorney's fees, costs, and expenses of the party. The
relief and remedies set forth in this section shall not be
deemed exclusive and shall be in addition to any other
relief or remedies permitted by law. The court may award
the prevailing party, if not the state of Missouri or a
political subdivision thereof, reasonable attorney's fees
and costs.
(5) Sovereign immunity shall not be an affirmative
defense to any action brought under this section.

SB 1055 4
144.049. 1. For purposes of this section, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Clothing", any article of wearing apparel
intended to be worn on or about the human body including,
but not limited to, disposable diapers for infants or adults
and footwear. The term shall include, but not be limited
to, cloth and other material used to make school uniforms or
other school clothing. Items normally sold in pairs shall
not be separated to qualify for the exemption. The term
shall not include watches, watchbands, jewelry, handbags,
handkerchiefs, umbrellas, scarves, ties, headbands, or belt
buckles; and
(2) "Personal computers", a laptop, desktop, or tower
computer system which consists of a central processing unit,
random access memory, a storage drive, a display monitor,
and a keyboard and devices designed for use in conjunction
with a personal computer, such as a disk drive, memory
module, compact disk drive, daughterboard, digitizer,
microphone, modem, motherboard, mouse, multimedia speaker,
printer, scanner, single-user hardware, single-user
operating system, soundcard, or video card;
(3) "School supplies", any item normally used by
students in a standard classroom for educational purposes,
including but not limited to textbooks, notebooks, paper,
writing instruments, crayons, art supplies, rulers, book
bags, backpacks, handheld calculators, chalk, maps, and
globes. The term shall not include watches, radios, CD
players, headphones, sporting equipment, portable or desktop
telephones, copiers or other office equipment, furniture, or
fixtures. School supplies shall also include computer
software having a taxable value of three hundred fifty

SB 1055 5
dollars or less and any graphing calculator having a taxable
value of one hundred fifty dollars or less.
2. In each year beginning on or after January 1, 2005,
there is hereby specifically exempted from state and local
sales tax law all retail sales of any article of clothing
having a taxable value of one hundred dollars or less, all
retail sales of school supplies not to exceed fifty dollars
per purchase, all computer software with a taxable value of
three hundred fifty dollars or less, all graphing
calculators having a taxable value of one hundred fifty
dollars or less, [and] all retail sales of personal
computers or computer peripheral devices not to exceed one
thousand five hundred dollars, and all retail sales of
firearms and ammunition, during a three-day period beginning
at 12:01 a.m. on the first Friday in August and ending at
midnight on the Sunday following. If a purchaser and seller
are located in two different time zones, the time zone of
the purchaser's location shall determine the authorized
exemption period.
3. This section shall not apply to any sales which
take place within the Missouri state fairgrounds.
4. This section applies to sales of items bought for
personal use only.
5. This section may not apply to any retailer when
less than two percent of the retailer's merchandise offered
for sale qualifies for the sales tax holiday. The retailer
may offer a sales tax refund in lieu of the sales tax
holiday.
6. A sale of property that is eligible for an
exemption under subsection 1 of this section but is
purchased under a layaway sale shall only qualify for an
exemption if:

SB 1055 6
(1) Final payment on a layaway order is made by, and
the property is given to, the purchaser during the exemption
period; or
(2) The purchaser selects the property and the seller
accepts the order for the property during the exemption
period, for immediate delivery upon full payment, even if
delivery is made after the exemption period.
7. The exemption of a bundled transaction shall be
calculated as provided by law for all other bundled
transactions.
8. (1) For any discount offered by a seller that is a
reduction of the sales price of the product, the discounted
sales price shall determine whether the sales price falls
below the price threshold provided in subsection 2 of this
section. A coupon that reduces the sales price shall be
treated as a discount only if the seller is not reimbursed
for the coupon amount by a third party.
(2) If a discount applies to the total amount paid by
a purchaser rather than to the sales price of a particular
product and the purchaser has purchased both exempt property
and taxable property, the seller shall allocate the discount
based on the total sales prices of the taxable property
compared to the total sales prices of all property sold in
the same transaction.
9. Items that are normally sold as a single unit shall
continue to be sold in that manner and shall not be priced
separately and sold as individual items.
10. Items that are purchased during an exemption
period but that are not delivered to the purchaser until
after the exemption period due to the item not being in
stock shall qualify for an exemption. The provisions of
this subsection shall not apply to an item that was

SB 1055 7
delivered during an exemption period but was purchased prior
to or after the exemption period.
11. (1) If a purchaser purchases an item of eligible
property during an exemption period but later exchanges the
100 item for a similar eligible item after the exemption period,
101 no additional tax shall be due on the new item.
102 (2) If a purchaser purchases an item of eligible
103 property during an exemption period but later returns the
104 item after the exemption period and receives credit on the
105 purchase of a different nonexempt item, the appropriate
106 sales tax shall be due on the sale of the newly purchased
107 item.
108 (3) If a purchaser purchases an item of eligible
109 property before an exemption period but during the exemption
110 period returns the item and receives credit on the purchase
111 of a different item of eligible property, no sales tax shall
112 be due on the sale of the new item if the new item is
113 purchased during the exemption period.
114 (4) For a sixty-day period immediately following the
115 end of the exemption period, if a purchaser returns an
116 exempt item, no credit for or refund of sales tax shall be
117 given unless the purchaser provides a receipt or invoice
118 that shows tax was paid or the seller has sufficient
119 documentation to show that tax was paid on the item being
120 returned.
144.526. 1. This section shall be known and may be
cited as the "Show Me Green Sales Tax Holiday".
2. For purposes of this section, the following terms
mean:
(1) "Appliance", clothes washers and dryers, water
heaters, trash compactors, dishwashers, conventional ovens,

SB 1055 8
ranges, stoves, air conditioners, furnaces, refrigerators
and freezers; and
(2) "Energy star certified", any appliance approved by
both the United States Environmental Protection Agency and
the United States Department of Energy as eligible to
display the energy star label, as amended from time to time.
3. In each year beginning on or after January 1, 2009,
there is hereby specifically exempted from state sales tax
law and all local sales and use taxes all retail sales of
any energy star certified new appliance, up to one thousand
five hundred dollars per appliance, and all retail sales of
firearms and ammunition during a seven-day period beginning
at 12:01 a.m. on April nineteenth and ending at midnight on
April twenty-fifth. Where a purchaser and seller are
located in two different time zones, the time zone of the
purchaser's location shall determine the authorized
exemption period.
4. A sale of property that is eligible for an
exemption under subsection 3 of this section but is
purchased under a layaway sale shall only qualify for an
exemption if:
(1) Final payment on a layaway order is made by, and
the property is given to, the purchaser during the exemption
period; or
(2) The purchaser selects the property and the seller
accepts the order for the property during the exemption
period, for immediate delivery upon full payment, even if
delivery is made after the exemption period.
5. (1) For any discount offered by a seller that is a
reduction of the sales price of the product, the discounted
sales price shall determine whether the sales price falls
below the price threshold provided in subsection 3 of this

SB 1055 9
section. A coupon that reduces the sales price shall be
treated as a discount only if the seller is not reimbursed
for the coupon amount by a third party.
(2) If a discount applies to the total amount paid by
a purchaser rather than to the sales price of a particular
product and the purchaser has purchased both exempt property
and taxable property, the seller shall allocate the discount
based on the total sales prices of the taxable property
compared to the total sales prices of all property sold in
the same transaction.
6. Items that are normally sold as a single unit shall
continue to be sold in that manner and shall not be priced
separately and sold as individual items.
7. Items that are purchased during an exemption period
but that are not delivered to the purchaser until after the
exemption period due to the item not being in stock shall
qualify for an exemption. The provisions of this subsection
shall not apply to an item that was delivered during an
exemption period but was purchased prior to or after the
exemption period.
8. (1) If a purchaser purchases an item of eligible
property during an exemption period but later exchanges the
item for a similar eligible item after the exemption period,
no additional tax shall be due on the new item.
(2) If a purchaser purchases an item of eligible
property during an exemption period but later returns the
item after the exemption period and receives credit on the
purchase of a different nonexempt item, the appropriate
sales tax shall be due on the sale of the newly purchased
item.
(3) If a purchaser purchases an item of eligible
property before an exemption period but during the exemption

SB 1055 10
period returns the item and receives credit on the purchase
of a different item of eligible property, no sales tax shall
be due on the sale of the new item if the new item is
purchased during the exemption period.
(4) For a sixty-day period immediately following the
end of the exemption period, if a purchaser returns an
exempt item, no credit for or refund of sales tax shall be
given unless the purchaser provides a receipt or invoice
that shows tax was paid or the seller has sufficient
documentation to show that tax was paid on the item being
returned.
542.301. 1. Property which comes into the custody of
an officer or of a court as the result of any seizure and
which has not been forfeited pursuant to any other
provisions of law or returned to the claimant shall be
disposed of as follows:
(1) Stolen property, or property acquired in any other
manner declared an offense by chapters 569 and 570, but not
including any of the property referred to in subdivision (2)
of this subsection, shall be delivered by order of court
upon claim having been made and established, to the person
who is entitled to possession:
(a) The claim shall be made by written motion filed
with the court with which a motion to suppress has been, or
may be, filed. The claim shall be barred if not made within
one year from the date of the seizure;
(b) Upon the filing of such motion, the judge shall
order notice to be given to all persons interested in the
property, including other claimants and the person from
whose possession the property was seized, of the time, place
and nature of the hearing to be held on the motion. The
notice shall be given in a manner reasonably calculated to

SB 1055 11
reach the attention of all interested persons. Notice may
be given to unknown persons and to persons whose address is
unknown by publication in a newspaper of general circulation
in the county. No property shall be delivered to any
claimant unless all interested persons have been given a
reasonable opportunity to appear and to be heard;
(c) After a hearing, the judge shall order the
property delivered to the person or persons entitled to
possession, if any. The judge may direct that delivery of
property required as evidence in a criminal proceeding shall
be postponed until the need no longer exists;
(d) A law enforcement officer having custody of seized
property may, at any time that seized property has ceased to
be useful as evidence, request that the prosecuting attorney
of the county in which property was seized file a motion
with the court of such county for the disposition of the
seized property. If the prosecuting attorney does not file
such motion within sixty days of the request by the law
enforcement officer having custody of the seized property,
then such officer may request that the attorney general file
a written motion with the circuit court of the county or
judicial district in which the seizure occurred. Upon
filing of the motion, the court shall issue an order
directing the disposition of the property. Such disposition
may, if the property is not claimed within one year from the
date of the seizure or if no one establishes a right to it,
and the seized property has ceased to be useful as evidence,
include a public sale of the property. Pursuant to a motion
properly filed and granted under this section, the proceeds
of any sale, less necessary expenses of preservation and
sale, shall be paid into the county treasury for the use of
the county. If the property is not salable, the judge may

SB 1055 12
order its destruction. Notwithstanding any other provision
of law, if no claim is filed within one year of the seizure
and no motion pursuant to this section is filed within six
months thereafter, and the seized property has ceased to be
useful as evidence, the property shall be deemed abandoned,
converted to cash and shall be turned over immediately to
the treasurer pursuant to section 447.543;
(e) If the property is a living animal or is
perishable, the judge may, at any time, order it sold at
public sale. The proceeds shall be held in lieu of the
property. A written description of the property sold shall
be filed with the judge making the order of sale so that the
claimant may identify the property. If the proceeds are not
claimed within the time limited for the claim of the
property, the proceeds shall be paid into the county
treasury. If the property is not salable, the judge may
order its destruction.
(2) Weapons, tools, devices, computers, computer
equipment, computer software, computer hardware, cellular
telephones, or other devices capable of accessing the
internet, and substances other than motor vehicles, aircraft
or watercraft, used by the owner or with the owner's consent
as a means for committing felonies other than the offense of
possessing burglary tools in violation of section 569.180,
and property, the possession of which is an offense under
the laws of this state or which has been used by the owner,
or used with the owner's acquiescence or consent, as a raw
material or as an instrument to manufacture, produce, or
distribute, or be used as a means of storage of anything the
possession of which is an offense under the laws of this
state, or which any statute authorizes or directs to be
seized, other than lawfully possessed weapons seized by an

SB 1055 13
officer incident to an arrest, shall be forfeited to the
state of Missouri.
2. The officer who has custody of the property shall
inform the prosecuting attorney of the fact of seizure and
of the nature of the property. The prosecuting attorney
shall thereupon file a written motion with the court with
which the motion to suppress has been, or may be, filed
praying for an order directing the forfeiture of the
property. If the prosecuting attorney of a county in which
property is seized fails to file a motion with the court for
the disposition of the seized property within sixty days of
the request by a law enforcement officer, the officer having
custody of the seized property may request the attorney
general to file a written motion with the circuit court of
100 the county or judicial district in which the seizure
101 occurred. Upon filing of the motion, the court shall issue
102 an order directing the disposition of the property. The
103 signed motion shall be returned to the requesting agency. A
104 motion may also be filed by any person claiming the right to
105 possession of the property praying that the court declare
106 the property not subject to forfeiture and order it
107 delivered to the moving party.
108 3. Upon the filing of a motion either by the
109 prosecuting attorney or by a claimant, the judge shall order
110 notice to be given to all persons interested in the
111 property, including the person out of whose possession the
112 property was seized and any lienors, of the time, place and
113 nature of the hearing to be held on the motion. The notice
114 shall be given in a manner reasonably calculated to reach
115 the attention of all interested persons. Notice may be
116 given to unknown persons and to persons of unknown address
117 by publication in a newspaper of general circulation in the

SB 1055 14
118 county. Every interested person shall be given a reasonable
119 opportunity to appear and to be heard as to the nature of
120 the person's claim to the property and upon the issue of
121 whether or not it is subject to forfeiture.
122 4. If the evidence is clear and convincing that the
123 property in issue is in fact of a kind subject to forfeiture
124 under this subsection, the judge shall declare it forfeited
125 and order its destruction or sale, provided that, if the
126 property is a firearm, any sale of such property shall
127 comply with the provisions of section 571.095. The judge
128 shall direct that the destruction or sale of property needed
129 as evidence in a criminal proceeding shall be postponed
130 until this need no longer exists.
131 5. If the forfeited property can be put to a lawful
132 use, it may be ordered sold after any alterations which are
133 necessary to adapt it to a lawful use have been made. In
134 the case of computers, computer equipment, computer
135 software, computer hardware, cellular telephones, or other
136 devices capable of accessing the internet, or other devices
137 used in the acquisition, possession, or distribution of
138 child pornography or obscene material, the law enforcement
139 agency in possession of such items may, upon court order,
140 retain possession of such property and convert such property
141 to the use of the law enforcement agency for use in criminal
142 investigations. If there is a holder of a bona fide lien
143 against property which has been used as a means for
144 committing an offense or which has been used as a raw
145 material or as an instrument to manufacture or produce
146 anything which is an offense to possess, who establishes
147 that the use was without the lienholder's acquiescence or
148 consent, the proceeds, less necessary expenses of
149 preservation and sale, shall be paid to the lienholder to

SB 1055 15
150 the amount of the lienholder's lien. The remaining amount
151 shall be paid into the county treasury.
152 6. If the property is perishable the judge may order
153 it sold at a public sale or destroyed, as may be
154 appropriate, prior to a hearing. The proceeds of a sale,
155 less necessary expenses of preservation and sale, shall be
156 held in lieu of the property.
157 7. When a warrant has been issued to search for and
158 seize allegedly obscene matter for forfeiture to the state,
159 after an adversary hearing, the judge, upon return of the
160 warrant with the matter seized, shall give notice of the
161 fact to the prosecuting attorney of the county in which the
162 matter was seized and the dealer, exhibitor or displayer and
163 shall conduct further adversary proceedings to determine
164 whether the matter is subject to forfeiture. If the
165 evidence is clear and convincing that the matter is obscene
166 as defined by law and it was being held or displayed for
167 sale, exhibition, distribution or circulation to the public,
168 the judge shall declare it to be obscene and forfeited to
169 the state and order its destruction or other disposition;
170 except that, no forfeiture shall be declared without the
171 dealer, distributor or displayer being given a reasonable
172 opportunity to appear in opposition and without the judge
173 having thoroughly examined each item. If the material to be
174 seized is the same as or another copy of matter that has
175 already been determined to be obscene in a criminal
176 proceeding against the dealer, exhibitor, displayer or such
177 person's agent, the determination of obscenity in the
178 criminal proceeding shall constitute clear and convincing
179 evidence that the matter to be forfeited pursuant to this
180 subsection is obscene. Except when the dealer, exhibitor or
181 displayer consents to a longer period, or by such person's

SB 1055 16
182 actions or pleadings willfully prevents the prompt
183 resolution of the hearing, judgment shall be rendered within
184 ten days of the return of the warrant. If the matter is not
185 found to be obscene or is not found to have been held or
186 displayed for sale, exhibition or distribution to the
187 public, or a judgment is not entered within the time
188 provided for, the matter shall be restored forthwith to the
189 dealer, exhibitor or displayer.
190 8. If an appeal is taken by the dealer, exhibitor or
191 displayer from an adverse judgment, the case should be
192 assigned for hearing at the earliest practicable date and
193 expedited in every way. Destruction or disposition of a
194 matter declared forfeited shall be postponed until the
195 judgment has become final by exhaustion of appeal, or by
196 expiration of the time for appeal, and until the matter is
197 no longer needed as evidence in a criminal proceeding.
198 9. A determination of obscenity, pursuant to this
199 subsection, shall not be admissible in any criminal
200 proceeding against any person or corporation for sale or
201 possession of obscene matter; except that dealer,
202 distributor or displayer from which the obscene matter was
203 seized for forfeiture to the state.
204 10. When allegedly obscene matter or pornographic
205 material for minors has been seized under a search warrant
206 issued pursuant to subsection 2 of section 542.281 and the
207 matter is no longer needed as evidence in a criminal
208 proceeding the prosecuting attorney of the county in which
209 the matter was seized may file a written motion with the
210 circuit court of the county or judicial district in which
211 the seizure occurred praying for an order directing the
212 forfeiture of the matter. Upon filing of the motion, the
213 court shall set a date for a hearing. Written notice of

SB 1055 17
214 date, time, place and nature of the hearing shall be
215 personally served upon the owner, dealer, exhibitor,
216 displayer or such person's agent. Such notice shall be
217 served no less than five days before the hearing.
218 11. If the evidence is clear and convincing that the
219 matter is obscene as defined by law, and that the obscene
220 material was being held or displayed for sale, exhibition,
221 distribution or circulation to the public or that the matter
222 is pornographic for minors and that the pornographic
223 material was being held or displayed for sale, exhibition,
224 distribution or circulation to minors, the judge shall
225 declare it to be obscene or pornographic for minors and
226 forfeited to the state and order its destruction or other
227 disposition. A determination that the matter is obscene in
228 a criminal proceeding as well as a determination that such
229 obscene material was held or displayed for sale, exhibition,
230 distribution or circulation to the public or a determination
231 that the matter is pornographic for minors in a criminal
232 proceeding as well as a determination that such pornographic
233 material was held or displayed for sale, exhibition,
234 distribution or circulation to minors shall be clear and
235 convincing evidence that such material should be forfeited
236 to the state; except that, no forfeiture shall be declared
237 without the dealer, distributor or displayer being given a
238 reasonable opportunity to appear in opposition and without a
239 judge having thoroughly examined each item. A dealer,
240 distributor or displayer shall have had reasonable
241 opportunity to appear in opposition if the matter the
242 prosecutor seeks to destroy is the same matter that formed
243 the basis of a criminal proceeding against the dealer,
244 distributor or displayer where the dealer, distributor or
245 displayer has been charged and found guilty of holding or

SB 1055 18
246 displaying for sale, exhibiting, distributing or circulating
247 obscene material to the public or pornographic material for
248 minors to minors. If the matter is not found to be obscene,
249 or if obscene material is not found to have been held or
250 displayed for sale, exhibition, distribution or circulation
251 to the public, or if the matter is not found to be
252 pornographic for minors or if pornographic material is not
253 found to have been held or displayed for sale, exhibition,
254 distribution or circulation to minors, the matter shall be
255 restored forthwith to the dealer, exhibitor or displayer.
256 12. If an appeal is taken by the dealer, exhibitor or
257 displayer from an adverse judgment, the case shall be
258 assigned for hearing at the earliest practicable date and
259 expedited in every way. Destruction or disposition of
260 matter declared forfeited shall be postponed until the
261 judgment has become final by exhaustion of appeal, or by
262 expiration of the time for appeal, and until the matter is
263 no longer needed as evidence in a criminal proceeding.
264 13. A determination of obscenity shall not be
265 admissible in any criminal proceeding against any person or
266 corporation for sale or possession of obscene matter.
267 14. An appeal by any party shall be allowed from the
268 judgment of the court as in other civil actions.
269 15. All other property still in the custody of an
270 officer or of a court as the result of any seizure and which
271 has not been forfeited pursuant to this section or any other
272 provision of law after three years following the seizure and
273 which has ceased to be useful as evidence shall be deemed
274 abandoned, converted to cash and shall be turned over
275 immediately to the treasurer pursuant to section 447.543.
563.031. 1. A person may, subject to the provisions
of subsection 2 of this section, use physical force upon

SB 1055 19
another person when and to the extent he or she reasonably
believes such force to be necessary to defend himself or
herself or a third person from what he or she reasonably
believes to be the use or imminent use of unlawful force by
such other person, unless:
(1) The actor was the initial aggressor; except that
in such case his or her use of force is nevertheless
justifiable provided:
(a) He or she has withdrawn from the encounter and
effectively communicated such withdrawal to such other
person but the latter persists in continuing the incident by
the use or threatened use of unlawful force; or
(b) He or she is a law enforcement officer and as such
is an aggressor pursuant to section 563.046; or
(c) The aggressor is justified under some other
provision of this chapter or other provision of law;
(2) Under the circumstances as the actor reasonably
believes them to be, the person whom he or she seeks to
protect would not be justified in using such protective
force;
(3) The actor was attempting to commit, committing, or
escaping after the commission of a forcible felony.
2. A person shall not use deadly force upon another
person under the circumstances specified in subsection 1 of
this section unless:
(1) He or she reasonably believes that such deadly
force is necessary to protect himself, or herself or her
unborn child, or another against death, serious physical
injury, or any forcible felony;
(2) Such force is used against a person who unlawfully
enters, remains after unlawfully entering, or attempts to

SB 1055 20
unlawfully enter a dwelling, residence, or vehicle lawfully
occupied by such person; or
(3) Such force is used against a person who unlawfully
enters, remains after unlawfully entering, or attempts to
unlawfully enter private property that is owned or leased by
an individual, or is occupied by an individual who has been
given specific authority by the property owner to occupy the
property, claiming a justification of using protective force
under this section.
3. A person does not have a duty to retreat:
(1) From a dwelling, residence, or vehicle where the
person is not unlawfully entering or unlawfully remaining;
(2) From private property that is owned or leased by
such individual; or
(3) If the person is in any other location such person
has the right to be.
4. The justification afforded by this section extends
to the use of physical restraint as protective force
provided that the actor takes all reasonable measures to
terminate the restraint as soon as it is reasonable to do so.
5. [The defendant shall have the burden of injecting
the issue of justification under this section. If a
defendant asserts that his or her use of force is described
under subdivision (2) of subsection 2 of this section, the
burden shall then be on the state to prove beyond a
reasonable doubt that the defendant did not reasonably
believe that the use of such force was necessary to defend
against what he or she reasonably believed was the use or
imminent use of unlawful force] There shall be a presumption
of reasonableness under this section that the defendant
believed such force was necessary to defend himself or

SB 1055 21
herself or a third person from what he or she believed to be
the use or imminent use of unlawful force by another person.
563.085. 1. A person who uses or threatens to use
force pursuant to section 563.031 is justified in such
conduct and is immune from criminal prosecution and civil
action for the use or threatened use of such force by the
person, personal representative, or heirs of the person
against whom the force was used or threatened, unless the
person against whom force was used or threatened is a law
enforcement officer who was acting in the performance of his
or her official duties and the officer identified himself or
herself in accordance with any applicable law or the person
using or threatening to use force knew or reasonably should
have known that the person was a law enforcement officer.
As used in this subsection, the term "criminal prosecution"
includes arresting, detaining in custody, and charging or
prosecuting the defendant.
2. A law enforcement agency may use standard
procedures for investigating the use or threatened use of
force as described in subsection 1 of this section, but the
agency may not arrest the person for using or threatening to
use force unless the agency determines that there is
probable cause that the force that was used or threatened
was unlawful.
3. In a criminal prosecution or civil action, once a
prima facie claim of self-defense immunity has been raised
by the defendant at a pretrial immunity hearing, the burden
of proof by clear and convincing evidence is on the party
seeking to overcome the immunity provided in subsection 1 of
this section.

SB 1055 22
571.020. 1. A person commits an offense if such
person knowingly possesses, manufactures, transports,
repairs, or sells:
(1) An explosive weapon;
(2) An explosive, incendiary or poison substance or
material with the purpose to possess, manufacture or sell an
explosive weapon;
(3) A gas gun;
(4) A bullet or projectile which explodes or detonates
upon impact because of an independent explosive charge after
having been shot from a firearm; [or]
(5) Knuckles; or
(6) Any of the following in violation of federal law:
(a) A machine gun;
(b) A short-barreled rifle or shotgun; or
(c) [A firearm silencer; or
(d)] A switchblade knife.
2. A person does not commit an offense pursuant to
this section if his or her conduct involved any of the items
in subdivisions (1) to (5) of subsection 1 of this section,
the item was possessed in conformity with any applicable
federal law, and the conduct:
(1) Was incident to the performance of official duty
by the Armed Forces, National Guard, a governmental law
enforcement agency, or a penal institution; or
(2) Was incident to engaging in a lawful commercial or
business transaction with an organization enumerated in
subdivision (1) of this [section] subsection; or
(3) Was incident to using an explosive weapon in a
manner reasonably related to a lawful industrial or
commercial enterprise; or

SB 1055 23
(4) Was incident to displaying the weapon in a public
museum or exhibition; or
(5) Was incident to using the weapon in a manner
reasonably related to a lawful dramatic performance.
3. An offense pursuant to subdivision (1), (2), (3) or
(6) of subsection 1 of this section is a class D felony; a
crime pursuant to subdivision (4) or (5) of subsection 1 of
this section is a class A misdemeanor.
4. The offense of knowingly possessing, manufacturing,
transporting, repairing, or selling a firearm silencer, as
it existed immediately before August 28, 2026, shall not be
prosecuted on or after August 28, 2026. If on August 28,
2026, a criminal action is pending for such offense, the
action is dismissed on that date. However, a final
conviction for such offense that exists on August 28, 2026,
shall not be affected.
571.095. Upon conviction for or attempting to commit a
felony in violation of any law perpetrated in whole or in
part by the use of a firearm, the court may, in addition to
the penalty provided by law for such offense, order the
confiscation and disposal or sale or trade to a licensed
firearms dealer of firearms and ammunition used in the
commission of the crime or found in the possession or under
the immediate control of the defendant at the time of his or
her arrest. Notice of any sale of a firearm or ammunition
made pursuant to this section shall be given by the police
department or sheriff's department responsible for the
confiscation of the firearm or ammunition by posting such
notice on the department's website and on any social media
accounts maintained by the department. The department
making a sale pursuant to this section shall ensure that the
sale is not made to any person who is ineligible to purchase

SB 1055 24
or possess a firearm or ammunition under any applicable
state or federal law. The proceeds of any sale or gains
from trade shall be the property of the police department or
sheriff's department responsible for the defendant's arrest
or the confiscation of the firearms and ammunition. If such
firearms or ammunition are not the property of the convicted
felon, they shall be returned to their rightful owner if he
or she is known and was not a participant in the crime. Any
proceeds collected under this section shall be deposited
with the municipality or by the county treasurer into the
county sheriff's revolving fund established in section
50.535.
571.930. As used in sections 571.930 to 571.940, the
following terms mean:
(1) "Firearm suppressor", any device designed, made,
or adapted to muffle the report of a firearm;
(2) "Generic and insignificant part", an item that has
manufacturing or consumer product applications other than
inclusion in a firearm suppressor. The term "generic and
insignificant part" includes a spring, screw, nut, or pin;
(3) "Manufacture", forging, casting, machining, or
another process for working a material.
571.935. 1. (1) For the purposes of this section, a
firearm suppressor is manufactured in this state if the item
is manufactured:
(a) In this state from basic materials; and
(b) Without the inclusion of any part imported from
another state other than a generic and insignificant part.
(2) For the purposes of this section, a firearm
suppressor is manufactured in this state if it is
manufactured as described in subdivision (1) of this
subsection without regard to whether a firearm imported into

SB 1055 25
this state from another state is attached to or used in
conjunction with the suppressor.
2. (1) A firearm suppressor that is manufactured in
this state and remains in this state shall not be subject to
federal law or federal regulation, including registration,
under the authority of the United States Congress to
regulate interstate commerce.
(2) A basic material from which a firearm suppressor
is manufactured in this state, including unmachined steel,
shall not be a firearm suppressor and is not subject to
federal regulation under the authority of the United States
Congress to regulate interstate commerce as if it actually
were a firearm suppressor.
3. A firearm suppressor manufactured and sold in this
state shall have the words "Made in Missouri" clearly
stamped on it.
4. On written notification to the attorney general by
a United States citizen who resides in this state of the
citizen's intent to manufacture a firearm suppressor to
which subsection 2 of this section applies, the attorney
general shall seek a declaratory judgment from a federal
district court in this state that subsection 2 of this
section is consistent with the United States Constitution.
5. The provisions of this section shall apply only to
firearm suppressors that are manufactured on or after August
28, 2026.
571.940. 1. The provisions of this section shall
apply to:
(1) The state of Missouri, including an agency,
department, commission, bureau, board, office, council,
court, or other entity that is in any branch of state
government and that is created by the constitution or a

SB 1055 26
statute of this state, including a university system or a
system of higher education;
(2) The governing body of a municipality, county, or
special district or authority;
(3) An officer, employee, or other body that is part
of a municipality, county, or special district or authority,
including a sheriff, municipal police department, municipal
attorney, or county attorney; and
(4) A prosecuting attorney, county counselor, or
circuit attorney.
2. (1) An entity described in subsection 1 of this
section shall not adopt a rule, order, ordinance, or policy
under which the entity enforces, or by consistent action
allows the enforcement of, a federal statute, order, rule,
or regulation that purports to regulate a firearm suppressor
if the statute, order, rule, or regulation imposes a
prohibition, restriction, or other regulation that does not
exist under the laws of this state.
(2) No entity described in subsection 1 of this
section and no person employed by or otherwise under the
direction or control of the entity shall enforce or attempt
to enforce any federal statute, order, rule, or regulation
described in subdivision (1) of this subsection.
3. (1) An entity described in subsection 1 of this
section shall not receive state grant funds if the entity
adopts a rule, order, ordinance, or policy under which the
entity enforces a federal law described in subdivision (1)
of subsection 2 of this section or, by consistent action,
allows the enforcement of a federal law described in
subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this section.
(2) State grant funds for the entity shall be denied
for the fiscal year following the year in which a final

SB 1055 27
judicial determination in an action brought under this
section is made that the entity has violated subdivision (1)
of subsection 2 of this section.
4. (1) Any citizen residing in the jurisdiction of an
entity described in subsection 1 of this section may file a
complaint with the attorney general if the citizen offers
evidence to support an allegation that the entity has
adopted a rule, order, ordinance, or policy under which the
entity enforces a federal law described in subdivision (1)
of subsection 2 of this section or that the entity, by
consistent action, allows the enforcement of a federal law
described in subdivision (1) of subsection 2 of this
section. The citizen shall include with the complaint any
evidence the citizen has in support of the complaint.
(2) If the attorney general determines that a
complaint filed under subdivision (1) of this subsection
against an entity described in subsection 1 of this section
is valid, to compel the entity's compliance with this
section, the attorney general may file a petition for a writ
of mandamus or apply for other appropriate equitable relief
in the circuit court of Cole County or the circuit court in
any county in which the principal office of the entity is
located. The attorney general may recover reasonable
expenses incurred obtaining relief under this subdivision,
including court costs, reasonable attorney's fees,
investigative costs, witness fees, and deposition costs.
(3) In any appeal of a suit brought under subdivision
(2) of this subsection, the appellate court shall expedite
the case by entering such scheduling orders as are necessary
to ensure that a final order or judgment will be entered
with the least possible delay.

SB 1055 28
[563.016. The fact that conduct is
justified under this chapter does not abolish or
impair any remedy for such conduct which is
available in any civil actions.]
Section B. Because immediate action is necessary to
limit any overreach of the federal government's power and to
protect citizens' rights to bear arms, the enactment of
section 1.486 of section A of this act is deemed necessary
for the immediate preservation of the public health,
welfare, peace, and safety, and is hereby declared to be an
emergency act within the meaning of the constitution, and
the enactment of section 1.486 of section A of this act
shall be in full force and effect upon its passage and
approval.
✓